Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1108.03
Learners with high ability; rules and regulations.

The State Board of Education shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to implement sections 79-1105 to 79-1108.03, including criteria for the approval of accelerated or differentiated curriculum programs and data requirements for measuring academic progress of students participating in the accelerated or differentiated curriculum programs.

Laws 1998, LB 1229, § 11.